North Dakota statutes. TITLE 36 Livestock
CHAPTER 36-01 State Board of Animal Health
36-01-36.
Premises identification, animal identification, and animal tracking — Open records — Exception.

The board shall maintain the confidentiality of information created, collected, or maintained by the state veterinarian for purposes of premises identification, animal identification, or animal tracking, including the name and address of the owner or lessee of the property where an animal found, is located.

The information described in subsection 1 is not subject to section 44-04-18 and may not be disclosed unless:

Every individual who is the subject of the information provides written consent to the release of information;

The disclosure is authorized pursuant to federal law;

The disclosure is necessary to provide a state or federal agency with information to assist in animal disease control or tracing an animal disease;

The disclosure is to the attorney general or to law enforcement to assist in a criminal investigation;

A court of competent jurisdiction orders the disclosure; or

The disclosure is to provide the North Dakota stockmen’s association with information pursuant to section 4.1-72-05.

A person violating this section is subject to the remedies set forth in section 44-04-21.2. For purposes of applying section 44-04-21.2, “public entity” includes any person that has contracted with the state for the provision of services related to a premises identification, animal identification, or animal tracking database program.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 284, § 2, effective April 9, 2019.